Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Liens on Crops, Advances, Lumber, Timber, Foals, Calves and Water Craft

§ 85-7-1.
Employer and employees; lien on crops.

Every employer shall have a lien on the share or interest of his employee in any crop made under such employment, for all advances of money, and for the fair market value of other things advanced by him, or anyone at his request, for supplies for himself, his family and business during the existence of such employment, which lien the employer may offset, recoup, or otherwise assert and maintain.

Every employee, laborer, cropper, part owner, overseer or manager, or other person who may aid by his labor to make, gather, or prepare for sale or market any crop, shall have a lien on the interest of the person who contracts with him for such labor for his wages, share or interest in such crop, whatever may be the kind of wages or the nature of the interest, which lien such employee, laborer, cropper, part owner, overseer or manager, or other person may offset, recoup or otherwise assert and maintain.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any lien arising under the provisions of this section shall be paramount to all liens and encumbrances or rights of any kind created by or against the person so contracting for such assistance when perfected in accordance with Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 – Secured Transactions (Section 75-9-101 et seq.), except the lien of the lessor of the land on which the crop is made, for rent and supplies furnished, as provided in the chapter on “Landlord and Tenant,” appearing as Chapter 7 of Title 89, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Any lien arising under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section in favor of any person other than an employee, laborer, cropper, part owner, overseer or manager as to crops or the proceeds thereof shall be effective against a third party only for a period of twenty-one (21) days from and after the time the labor is completed, unless within such period of time the lien is perfected in accordance with Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 – Secured Transactions (Section 75-9-101 et seq.). Any such lien in favor of any person other than an employee, laborer, cropper, overseer or manager which has not been perfected within the twenty-one-day period as herein provided shall, upon subsequent perfection of such lien, have the priority as against a third party to which a perfected security interest may be entitled under Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 – Secured Transactions (Section 75-9-101 et seq.).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1360; 1892, § 2682; 1906, § 3042; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2400; 1930, § 2238; 1942, § 336; Laws, 1894, ch. 71; Laws, 1985, ch. 492; Laws, 2001, ch. 495, § 33, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2002.

§ 85-7-3.
Sawmill employees and timber men; lien on lumber and timber.

Every employee or laborer of an employer engaged in the operation of a sawmill or planing mill or in cutting and shipping or rafting timber shall have a lien on all such lumber and timber for his wages due by such employer in preference to all other debts of the said employer; but such lien shall take effect as to purchases or incumbrances for a valuable consideration without notice thereof only from the time of commencing judicial proceedings to enforce the lien, and unless such proceedings have been begun the said lien shall expire six (6) months after the claim is due.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 2415, 2416, 2417; 1930, § 2240; 1942, § 338; Laws, 1908, ch. 131; Laws, 1922, ch. 282.

§ 85-7-5.
Owner of stallion, jackass, or bull; lien on foal or calf.

The owner of a stallion, jackass or bull shall have a lien on each foal begotten by his stallion or jackass, and on each calf begotten by his bull, for the price agreed to be paid therefor, and such lien shall be prior to all other incumbrances on such foal or calf and shall bind the same even in the hands of subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers for a valuable consideration without notice; but the said lien shall expire twelve months after the birth of said foal or calf unless within that time judicial proceedings have been begun to enforce the lien. If the owner shall have falsely represented the breeding, registration, or pedigree of his stallion, jackass or bull, by advertisement or otherwise, he shall not have a lien on the foal begotten by such stallion or jackass, or on the calf of such bull, as against any person who acted under the belief that such representation was true; and, in such case, the owner of the animal shall not have any claim for the service of the stallion, jackass, or bull.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1394; 1892, §§ 2716, 2717, 2718; 1906, §§ 3076, 3077, 3078; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 2439, 2440, 2441; 1930, § 2241; 1942, § 339; Laws, 1888, p. 90; Laws, 1934, ch. 312; Laws, 1936, ch. 295.

§ 85-7-7.
Water craft; work, materials, supplies, etc.

There shall be a lien on all ships, steamboats and other water craft for work done or materials supplied by any person in this state for or concerning the building, repairing, fitting, furnishing, supplying or victualing such ships, steamboats or other water craft, and for the wages of the persons employed on board such vessel, boat, or craft, for work done or services rendered, in preference to all other debts due and owing from the owners thereof. The said lien shall expire six (6) months after the claim is due, unless judicial proceedings have been commenced to assert it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1395; 1892, § 2725; 1906, § 3085; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 2445, 2447; 1930, § 2242; 1942, § 340.

§ 85-7-9.
Water craft; municipal dockage, wharfage, or anchorage charges.

There shall be a lien on all skiffs, yachts, and other water craft in favor of any municipality operating a small craft or yacht harbor or basin for dockage, wharfage or anchorage charges for space or anchorage contracted for by the water craft or its owner or agent where the charge for such space or anchorage is made for a period of time without regard to the actual time such skiff, yacht or other water craft is actually docked or anchored to the dock, wharf, or at the mooring place in the basin. Such lien shall be paramount to all other debts due and owing by such water craft, or the owner thereof, or other lien thereon, except as provided by Section 85-7-7.

The lien, by this section provided, shall be enforced as provided by Sections 85-7-31 through 85-7-53, inclusive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 340-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 290, §§ 1, 2.